Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB717.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 531(b) of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 531. Debarment or suspension.* * *(b) Causes for debarment or suspension.--The causes for debarment or suspension include:* * *(6.1) Violation of the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516